Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 3. Definitions

§ 40-14-140.
General definitions.

In addition to definitions appearing in subsequent articles, in this act:

“Actuarial method” means the method, defined by rules adopted by the administrator, of allocating payments made on a debt between principal or amount financed and loan finance charge or credit service charge pursuant to which a payment is applied first to the accumulated loan finance charge or credit service charge and the balance is applied to the unpaid principal or unpaid amount financed;

“Administrator” means the administrator designated in the article (article 6) on administration (W.S.

40-14-603

);

“Agreement” means the bargain of the parties in fact as found in their language or by implication from other circumstances including course of dealing or usage of trade or course of performance;

“Agricultural purpose” means a purpose related to the production, harvest, exhibition, marketing, transportation, processing, or manufacture of agricultural products by a natural person who cultivates, plants, propagates, or nurtures the agricultural products. “Agricultural products” includes agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, and dairy products, livestock, wildlife, poultry, bees, forest products, fish and shellfish, and any products thereof, including processed and manufactured products, and any and all products raised or produced on farms and any processed or manufactured products thereof;

“Closing costs” with respect to a debt secured by an interest in land includes:

Fees or premiums for title examination, title insurance, or similar purposes including surveys;

Fees for preparation of a deed, settlement statement, or other documents;

Escrows for future payments of taxes and insurance;

Fees for notarizing deeds and other documents;

Appraisal fees; and

Credit reports.

“Conspicuous”. — A term or clause is conspicuous when it is so written that a reasonable person against whom it is to operate ought to have noticed it. Whether a term or clause is conspicuous or not is for decision by the court;

“Credit” means the right granted by a creditor to a debtor to defer payment of debt or to incur debt and defer its payment;

“Earnings” means compensation paid or payable to an individual or for his account for personal services rendered or to be rendered by him, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and includes periodic payments pursuant to a pension, retirement, or disability program;

“Lender credit card or similar arrangement” means an arrangement or loan agreement, other than a seller credit card, pursuant to which a lender gives a debtor the privilege of using a credit card, letter of credit, or other credit confirmation or identification in transactions out of which debt arises:

By the lender’s honoring a draft or similar order for the payment of money drawn or accepted by the debtor;

By the lender’s payment or agreement to pay the debtor’s obligations; or

By the lender’s purchase from the obligee of the debtor’s obligations.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 124, § 3.

“Official fees” means:

Fees and charges prescribed by law which actually are or will be paid to public officials for determining the existence of or for perfecting, releasing, or satisfying a security interest related to a consumer credit sale, consumer lease, or consumer loan; or

Premiums payable for insurance in lieu of perfecting a security interest otherwise required by the creditor in connection with the sale, lease, or loan, if the premium does not exceed the fees and charges described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph which would otherwise be payable.

“Organization” means a sole proprietorship, limited liability company, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, trust, estate, partnership, cooperative, association or other entity, public or private;

“Payable in installments” means that payment is required or permitted by a written agreement in five (5) or more installments. If any periodic payment other than the down payment under an agreement requiring or permitting two (2) or more periodic payments is more than twice the amount of any other periodic payment, excluding the down payment, the consumer credit sale, consumer lease or consumer loan is “payable in installments”;

“Person” includes a natural person or an individual, and an organization;

“Person related to” with respect to an individual, means:
(xv) (A) “Person related to” with respect to an individual, means:

The spouse of the individual;

A brother, brother-in-law, sister, sister-in-law of the individual;

An ancestor or lineal descendant of the individual or his spouse; and

Any other relative, by blood or marriage, of the individual or his spouse who shares the same home with the individual;

“Person related to” with respect to an organization means:

A person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by or under common control with the organization;

An officer or director of the organization or a person performing similar functions with respect to the organization or to a person related to the organization;

The spouse of a person related to the organization; and

A relative by blood or marriage of a person related to the organization who shares the same home with him.

“Presumed” or “presumption” means that the trier of fact must find the existence of the fact presumed unless and until evidence is introduced which would support a finding of its nonexistence;

“Rule of 78's” means the method used in the calculation of rebate upon prepayment where the unearned portion of the credit service charge or loan finance charge is a fraction of the charge of which the numerator is the sum of the periodic balances scheduled to follow the computational period in which prepayment occurs and the denominator is the sum of all periodic balances under the related consumer credit sale agreement, the loan agreement or, if the balance owing resulted from a refinancing or a consolidation, the related refinancing agreement or consolidation agreement;

“Seller credit card” means an arrangement in which a person gives to a buyer or lessee the privilege of using a credit card, letter of credit or other credit confirmation or identification primarily for the purpose of purchasing or leasing goods or services from that person or from that person and any other person;

“Supervised financial organization” means a depository institution as defined by 12 U.S.C. § 1813(c);

and (B) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 14, § 3.

“Licensee” means an organization licensed under this act;

“Incident to the extension of credit” means a charge assessed at any time during the duration of a credit transaction that is not assessed to a consumer in a comparable cash transaction whether imposed by the original creditor or an assignee or servicer of the credit transaction;

“Regulation Z” means regulation Z as promulgated by the board of governors of the federal reserve system and codified in 12 C.F.R. part 1026 et seq., as amended;

“Channeling agent” means the third party licensing system that gathers the application information and distributes it to Wyoming for review for the approval or denial decision;

“Registry” means the nationwide licensing system and registry maintained by the State Regulatory Registry, LLC;

“Current installment” means the intervening period between regularly scheduled payments;

“Regularly engages” or “regularly engaged” means the extension of credit more than twenty-five (25) times, or more than five (5) times for transactions secured by a dwelling as defined by W.S. 40-14-640(a)(iv), in the preceding calendar year. The requirements of this paragraph may be applied to the current calendar year if not met in the preceding year;

“This act” means W.S.

40-14-101

through

40-14-649

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-301; W.S. 1957, § 40-1-301; Laws 1979, ch. 117, § 1; 1982, ch. 29, § 2; 1983, ch. 109, § 1; 1988, ch. 49, § 1; 1989, ch. 187, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2013 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 124, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 14, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to reasonable closing costs as “additional charges,” see §

40-14-213

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(xii), inserted “sole proprietorship, limited liability company” preceding “corporation” and added “or other entity, public or private” at the end; added (a)(xx) and redesignated the remaining paragraph.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment by ch. 27 § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(xxi) and (a)(xxii) and renumbered (a)(xxi) to (a)(xxiii).

The second 2013 amendment by ch. 124 §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013, repealed (a)(x) which read: “‘Mechanical breakdown insurance’ means a contractual undertaking in which a person for an additional charge undertakes to indemnify another for direct or consequential loss caused by the failure or malfunction of a component or system of any motor vehicle whether that loss is to be indemnified in funds, goods or services in any combination;” added (a)(xxi) and (a)(xxii) and redesignated former (a)(xxi) as (xxiii).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "depository institution as defined by 12 U.S.C. § 1813(c);" for "person other than an insurance company or other organization primarily engaged in an insurance business, which is:" in (a)(xix); added (a)(xxv) and (a)(xxvi); redesignated former (a)(xxv) as (a)(xxvii), and substituted "40-14-649" for "40-14-702" at the end.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (a)(xix)(A), which read, "Organized, chartered or holding an authorization certificate under the laws of this state, any other state or of the United States which authorizes the person to make loans and to receive deposits including a savings, share, certificate or deposit account; and"; and repealed (a)(xix)(B), which read, "Subject to supervision by an official or agency of any state or of the United States."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 27, § 3, directs:
“This act shall apply to new licenses issued
by the division of banking
under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code
and the Money Transmitter Act
on or after July 1, 2013. The provisions
of law existing prior to
amendment by this act shall apply to renewal
of licenses issued by
the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer
Credit Code and
the Money Transmitter Act prior to July 1, 2013.”

Stated

in

Steil v. Smith, 901 P.2d 395,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “finance charge” under § 106(a) of the Truth in Lending Act (15 USC § 1605(a)) or applicable regulations 154 ALR Fed 431.

Who is “creditor” within meaning of § 103(f) of Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1602(f)), 157 ALR Fed 419.

§ 40-14-141.
Definition.

In this act “Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act” means the Consumer Credit Protection Act (Public Law 90-321; 82 U.S. Statutes 146), as amended, and includes regulations issued pursuant to that act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-302; W.S. 1957, § 40-1-302.

Consumer Credit Protection Act. —

For codification of federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, referred to in this section, see editor's note to §

40-14-102

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of Consumer Credit Protection Act provisions prohibiting extortionate credit transactions, 7 ALR Fed 950, 106 ALR Fed 33.

Validity, construction and application of §§ 301 to 307 of Consumer Credit Protection Act placing restrictions on garnishment of individual's earnings, 14 ALR Fed 447.

Construction and application of Fair Credit Reporting Act, 17 ALR Fed 675, 101 ALR Fed 751.

What constitutes “business or commercial” purpose within meaning of § 104(1) of Truth in Lending Act (15 USC § 1603(1)), exempting business or commercial credit transactions from act, 54 ALR Fed 491.

What constitutes violation of § 134 of Consumer Credit Protection Act (15 USC § 1644), prohibiting fraudulent use of credit card, 72 ALR Fed 65.

What constitutes Truth in Lending Act violation which “was not intentional and resulted from bona fide error notwithstanding maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error” within meaning of § 130(c) of Act (15 USC § 1640(c)) 153 ALR Fed 193.

§ 40-14-142.
Index of definitions.

Definitions in this act and the sections in which they appear are:

“Actuarial method” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(i);

“Administrator” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(ii);

“Administrator” — W.S.

40-14-603

;

“Agreement” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(iii);

“Agricultural purpose” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(iv);

“Amount financed” — W.S.

40-14-211

;

and (viii) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 2.

“Cash price” — W.S.

40-14-210

;

“Closing costs” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(v);

“Conspicuous” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(vi);

“Consumer credit insurance” — W.S. 40-14-403(a)(i);

“Consumer credit sale” — W.S.

40-14-204

;

“Consumer lease” — W.S.

40-14-206

;

“Consumer loan” — W.S.

40-14-304

;

and (xvii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 14, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 98, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 98, § 2.

“Credit” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(vii);

“Credit Insurance Act” — W.S. 40-14-403(a)(ii);

“Credit service charge” — W.S.

40-14-209

;

“Earnings” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(viii);

“Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act [15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.; 18 U.S.C. § 891 et seq.]” — W.S.

40-14-141

;

“Goods” — W.S. 40-14-205(a);

“Home solicitation sale” — W.S.

40-14-251

;

“Lender” — W.S. 40-14-307(a);

“Lender credit card or similar arrangement” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(ix);

“Loan” — W.S.

40-14-306

;

“Loan finance charge” — W.S.

40-14-309

;

“Loan primarily secured by an interest in land” - W.S.

40-14-304

(c);

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 124, § 3.

“Merchandise certificate” — W.S. 40-14-205(b);

“Official fees” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xi);

“Organization” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xii);

“Payable in installments” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xiii);

“Pawnbroker” — W.S. 40-14-359(a)(i);

“Pawn finance charge” — W.S. 40-14-359(a)(ii);

“Pawn transaction” — W.S. 40-14-359(a)(iii);

“Person” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xiv);

“Person related to” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xv);

“Post-dated check or similar arrangement” — W.S. 40-14-362(a)(i);

“Post-dated check casher” — W.S. 40-14-362(a)(ii);

“Precomputed” (loan) — W.S. 40-14-307(b);

“Precomputed” (sale) — W.S. 40-14-205(g);

“Presumed” or “presumption” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xvi);

“Principal” — W.S. 40-14-307(c);

“Revolving charge account” — W.S.

40-14-208

;

“Revolving loan account” — W.S.

40-14-308

;

“Rule of 78's” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xvii);

“Sale of goods” — W.S. 40-14-205(d);

“Sale of an interest in land” — W.S. 40-14-205(f);

“Sale of services” — W.S. 40-14-205(e);

“Seller” — W.S.

40-14-207

;

“Seller credit card” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xviii);

“Services” — W.S. 40-14-205(c);

“Supervised financial organization” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xix);

and (lix) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 14, § 3.

“Channeling agent” —W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xxiii);

“Clerical or support duties” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(ii);

“Depository institution” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(iii);

“Dwelling” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(iv);

“Federal banking agency” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(v);

“Immediate family member” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(vi);

“Individual” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(vii);

“Licensee” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xx);

“Loan processor or underwriter” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(viii);

“Mortgage loan originator” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(ix);

“Nontraditional mortgage product” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(x);

“Real estate brokerage activity” —- W.S. 40-14-640(a)(xi);

“Registered mortgage loan originator” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(xii);

“Registry” —W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xxiv);

“Residential mortgage loan” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(xiv);

“Timeshare plan” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(xv);

“Unique identifier” — W.S. 40-14-640(a)(xvi);

“Incident to the extension of credit” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xxi);

“Regulation Z” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xxii);

“This act” - W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xxvii);

“Current installment” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xxv);

“Regularly engages” or “regularly engaged” — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xxvi).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-303; W.S. 1957, § 40-1-303; Laws 1979, ch. 117, § 1; 1989, ch. 187, § 1; 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2008, ch. 116, § 2; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2012, ch. 98, § 2; 2013 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 124, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 14, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed (a)(vii) which defined annual percentage rate—(sale), and (a)(viii) which defined annual percentage rate—(loan).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(lx) through (a)(lxxvi) and redesignated the remaining paragraph accordingly.

The 2012 amendment,

repealed former (a)(xviii) and (xix), which read: “(xviii) ‘Corresponding nominal annual percentage rate’ — (sale) — W.S. 40-14-225(c)” and “(xix) ‘Corresponding nominal annual percentage rate’ — (loan) — W.S. 40-14-323(c).”

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment, by ch. 27 § 1, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “40-14-140(a)(xxi)” for “40-14-640(a)(i)” in (a)(lx); and substituted “40-14-140(a)(xxii)” for “40-14-640(a)(xiii) in (a)(lxxiii).

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 124 §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(lxxvii) and (a)(lxxvii); redesignated former (a)(lxxvii) as (a)(lxxix); and substituted “40-14-140(a)(xxiii)” for “40-14-101 through

40-14-702

” in (a)(lxxix) and repealed (a)(xxxii) which read: “‘Mechanical breakdown insurance’ — W.S. 40-14-140(a)(x).”

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "40-14-304(c)" for "40-14-305" in (a)(xxxi); substituted "40-14-140(a)(xxvii)" for "40-14-140(a)(xxv)" in (a)(lxxix); added (a)(lxxx) and (a)(lxxxi); and made related changes.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (a)(xvi), which read, "'Consumer related loan' — W.S.

40-14-355

;"; repealed (a)(xvii), which read, "'Consumer related sale' — W.S.

40-14-257

;"; repealed (a)(lviii), which read, "'Supervised lender' — W.S. 40-14-341(b);"; and repealed (a)(lix), which read, "'Supervised loan' — W.S. 40-14-341(a);."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this act as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 27, § 3, directs:
“This act shall apply to new licenses issued
by the division of banking
under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code
and the Money Transmitter Act
on or after July 1, 2013. The provisions
of law existing prior to
amendment by this act shall apply to renewal
of licenses issued by
the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer
Credit Code and
the Money Transmitter Act prior to July 1, 2013.”